California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 fixing of fares; or an ordinance necessary for the immediate preservation or protection of the property, interests, or welfare of the district, which shall contain a specific statement showing its urgency, and which shall be passed by two-thirds of the total vote of the directors. All ordinances except those which take effect upon their adoption shall be subject to referendum in the manner provided by law for the legislative acts of boards of supervisors of counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 601.)
-------------------------------------------

28794.

All ordinances shall be published after passage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28795.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: “Be it enacted by the Board of Directors of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District:”

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28796.

All ordinances shall be signed by the president or the vice president of the board, and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Officers [28810. - 28818.]

28810.

(a) The officers of the district shall consist of the following:

(1) The members of the board of directors.

(2) A president and a vice president of the board, each of whom shall be a member of the board.

(3) A secretary.

(4) A general manager.

(5) A general counsel.

(6) Any other or subordinate officers, assistants, and deputies as the board may deem necessary and provide for by ordinance or resolution.

(b) The general counsel shall be a person admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of California and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of law for not less than
 10 years next preceding appointment pursuant to Section 28811.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

28811.

(a) The secretary, general manager, and general counsel shall be appointed by and may be removed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the members of the board of directors. All other officers and employees shall be appointed by the general manager and shall serve at the pleasure of the general manager, subject to the provisions of this part relating to personnel.

(b) The general manager shall appoint a chief financial officer and may designate other financial personnel to undertake any of
 the duties or responsibilities assigned to the chief financial officer under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

28812.

The compensation of all district officers and employees, except as otherwise provided in this part, shall be fixed by ordinance or resolution of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28813.

The board may consolidate any of the district offices in one person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28814.

The oath of office of all officers appointed by the board of directors or by the general manager of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than fifteen (15) days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28815.

Each officer shall give such bond and in such amount as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28816.

Article 4 (commencing at Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1, of the Government Code shall apply to all officers and contracts of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

28817.

The chief financial officer shall be the custodian of the funds of the district and shall make payments only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the general manager. The chief financial officer shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 3.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

28818.

(a) With the consent of the general manager, who shall seek consent from the board when deemed necessary, the chief financial officer may:

(1) Authorize
 any state or national bank in this state, a federally chartered or state chartered savings and loan association, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, to receive as the agent of the chief financial officer deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(2) Place and maintain for safekeeping with any state or national bank in this state, a
 federally chartered or state chartered savings and loan association, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, any securities owned by the district.

(3) Make deposits of securities for safekeeping pursuant to the provisions of Section 53608 of the Government Code.

(b) The financial institution selected
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The chief financial officer shall take from the financial institution a receipt for the securities, and neither the chief financial officer nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the financial institution by the
 chief financial officer. Any financial institution to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depositary for the chief financial officer, shall make such disposition of the securities as the chief financial officer directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the chief financial officer. All such securities
 are at all times subject to the order of the chief financial officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 4.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Manager [28830. - 28836.]

28830.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have charge, subject to the direction and control of the board, of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

28831.

All other things being equal, the general manager shall be chosen on the basis of his qualifications with special reference to his actual experience in or his knowledge of accepted practices in respect to the duties of his office as hereinafter set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28832.

The general manager need not be a resident of this State at the time of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28833.

The general manager shall hold office for an indefinite term and may be removed by the board only upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the board. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original
 appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board, is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28834.

The powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To have charge, subject to the direction and control of the board, of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district.

(b) To have charge, subject to the direction and control of the board, of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(c) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(d) To
 administer the personnel system adopted by the board and except for officers appointed by the board to appoint, discipline or remove all officers and employees subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board and the applicable provisions of this part.

(e) To prepare and submit to the board as soon as practical after the end of each fiscal year a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the district for the preceding year.

(f) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(g) To prepare or cause to be prepared all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(h) To devote his entire time to the business of the district.

(i) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(j) To cause to be installed and maintained a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

28835.

The general manager shall attend meetings of the board as directed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

28836.

The directors may appoint a general manager pro tempore during any absence or disability of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. The Office of the BART Inspector General [28840. - 28845.]

28840.

(a) There is hereby created in the district an independent Office of the BART Inspector General to ensure that the district makes effective use of bridge toll revenue and other revenue and operates efficiently, effectively, and in compliance with applicable federal and state laws.

(b) (1) The board shall nominate three persons to the Governor who shall appoint one of the three persons nominated by the board to serve as the BART Inspector General for an initial four-year term. The board shall have the option to renew the term at will. The BART Inspector General shall be removed from office by the board, subject to approval of the Governor, only if either of the following occur:

(A) A two-thirds majority of the members of the board votes for removal.

(B) The Inspector General violates a federal or state law or regulation, a local ordinance, or a policy or practice of the authority relative to ethical practices, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of gifts or contributions.

(2) The reasons for removal of the Inspector General shall be stated in writing and shall include the basis for removal. The document stating the reasons for dismissal shall be deemed a public document and posted on the district’s Internet Web site.

(c) Within one year of the operative date of this article, the board shall nominate three persons to serve as the first BART Inspector General to be appointed pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 28845.)
-------------------------------------------

28841.

The duties and responsibilities of the BART Inspector General shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) To examine the operating practices of the district to identify fraud, waste, and opportunities for efficiencies in the administration of programs and operations.

(b) To ensure the BART administration, the board of directors, and the public are fully informed of his or her findings and recommendations.

(c) To identify opportunities to improve the data used to determine project resource allocations.

(d) To conduct, supervise, and coordinate audits
 and investigations relating to the district’s programs and operations, including, but not limited to, toll-funded programs.

(e) To identify best practices in the delivery of capital projects and recommend policies to enable the district to adopt these practices when practicable.

(f) To recommend policies promoting efficiency in the administration of programs and operations.

(g) To review and recommend best practices that the district should follow to maintain positive and productive relations with its employees and the collective bargaining units representing those employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 28845.)
-------------------------------------------

28842.

The Office of the BART Inspector General shall receive one million dollars ($1,000,000) from an allocation of bridge toll revenue from the Bay Area Toll Authority. In the second and subsequent years of operation of the office, the authority may increase the amount of funding allocated for this purpose to the extent funds are requested and justified by the office and can be accommodated in the authority’s budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 28845.)
-------------------------------------------

28843.

The BART Inspector General shall report at least annually to the board of directors and the Legislature with a summary of his or her findings, investigations, and audits. The summary shall be posted on the district’s Internet Web site and shall otherwise be made available to the public upon its release to the board. The summary shall include, but need not be limited to, significant problems discovered by the BART Inspector General and whether recommendations of the BART Inspector General relative to investigations and audits have been implemented by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 28845.)
-------------------------------------------

28844.

Any investigatory file compiled by the BART Inspector General is an investigatory file compiled by a local law enforcement agency subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 404.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 28845.)
-------------------------------------------

28845.

This article shall become operative upon an affirmative vote of the residents of the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma to increase tolls pursuant to Section 30923 of the Streets and Highways Code on the bridges described in Section 30910 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This Section provides for the delayed operation of Article 7, commencing with Section 28840.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [28848. - 28863.]

28848.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “District” means the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, including all operations and extensions of its transportation system, regardless of modality or vehicle type, and excluding all temporary bus lines.

(b) “Employee organization” means an organization that includes employees of the district that has as one of its primary purposes representing those employees in their relations with the district. “Employee organization” shall also include any person of the organization authorized to act on its behalf.

(c) “Exclusive representative” means an accredited employee
 organization recognized or certified as the exclusive negotiating representative of employees in an appropriate unit within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28849.

(a) It is a primary purpose of this chapter to promote the improvement of personnel management and employer-employee relations within the district by providing a uniform basis for recognizing the right of employees to join employee organizations of their own choice, to be represented, to select one employee organization as the exclusive representative of the employees in an appropriate unit, and to afford employees a voice at work.

(b) The Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code, and the powers and duties of that board, as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall have jurisdiction, as appropriate, to
 enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28850.

(a) If a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by an employee organization, the board, after determining pursuant to Section 28851 that the employee organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall bargain with the
 exclusive representative of those employees. Both parties shall bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, and grievance procedures.

(1) If a dispute arises over the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions that is not resolved by negotiations conducted in good faith between the board and the exclusive representative, then upon the agreement of both parties, the board and the
 exclusive representative may submit the dispute to an arbitration board. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final.

(2) (A) The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, two representatives of the exclusive representative, and a fifth member to be agreed upon by the representatives of the district and the exclusive representative.

(B) If the representatives of the district and the
 exclusive representative are unable to agree on the fifth member, then the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The exclusive representative and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list supplied by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The exclusive representative and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. After the exclusive representative and the district have stricken four names, the name remaining shall be designated as the arbitrator.

(C) The district and the exclusive representative shall each pay one-half of the cost of the impartial arbitrator.

(b) A contract or
 agreement shall not be made with any exclusive representative, employee organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(c) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 3.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28851.

If there is a question whether an employee organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service for disposition. The
 California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing and may, by decision, establish the boundaries of any collective bargaining unit and provide for an election to determine the question of representation. Provided, however, any certification of an employee organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 4.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28852.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by said utility for at least seventy-five (75) days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination and shall be governed thereafter by the personnel system adopted by the board, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28853.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system; provided, however, that the outstanding obligations and liabilities of such public utility by reason of such pension plan have been considered and taken into account and allowance made for in the purchase price of such public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28854.

The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in Section 28853 and the benefits which are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28855.

All persons receiving pension benefits from such acquired public utility and all persons entitled to pension benefits under the pension plan of such acquired public utility may become members or receive pensions under the retirement system established by the district by mutual agreement of such persons and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28856.

(a) Exclusive representatives shall have the right to represent their bargaining unit members in employer-employee relations with the district, and employees shall have the right to be represented by their exclusive representative.

(b) This chapter is not intended to adversely affect any rights afforded to exclusive representatives or district employees under existing law, as it may be amended from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28857.

The district shall give reasonable written notice to an exclusive representative of its intent to make any change to matters within the scope of representation of the employees represented by the exclusive representative for purposes of providing the exclusive representative a reasonable amount of time to negotiate with the district regarding the proposed changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 6.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28858.

It is unlawful for the district to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, to discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise to interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter. As used in this subdivision, “employee” includes an applicant for employment or reemployment with the district.

(b) Deny employee organizations rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(c) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with an exclusive
 representative. Knowingly providing an exclusive representative with inaccurate information, whether or not it is in response to a request for information, constitutes a refusal or failure of the district to meet and negotiate in good faith with the exclusive representative.

(d) Dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization, or contribute financial or other support to it, or in any way encourage employees to join any employee organization in preference to another.

(e) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28859.

It is unlawful for an employee organization to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(b) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with the district concerning any of the employees of which it is the exclusive representative.

(c) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse
 procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 8.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28860.

(a) This chapter shall not displace, or supplant, the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3610) of Division 4.5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the impasse resolution and injunctive relief procedures provided for pursuant to Sections 3612 to 3614, inclusive, of the Government Code shall remain exclusive.

(b) The initial determination as to whether the charge of unfair practice is justified and, if so, the appropriate remedy necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, is a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the
 Public Employment Relations Board shall have no authority to award strike-preparation expenses as damages, and shall have no authority to award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 9.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28861.

(a) Any charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of that board not to issue a complaint in such a case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from that decision or order.

(b) A petition for a writ of extraordinary relief shall be filed in the district court of appeal having jurisdiction over any county in which the district operates. The petition shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, or order denying reconsideration, as applicable. Upon the
 filing of the petition, the court shall cause notice to be served upon the Public Employment Relations Board and thereafter shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless that time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper, and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board. The findings of the Public Employment Relations Board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. Title 1 (commencing
 with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superseded by this section, apply to proceedings pursuant to this section.

(c) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a Public Employment Relations Board decision or order has expired, the Public Employment Relations Board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or superior court having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The Public Employment Relations Board shall respond within 10 days to any inquiry from a party to the action as to why the Public Employment Relations Board has not sought court enforcement of the final decision or order. If the response does not indicate that there has been compliance with the
 Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, the Public Employment Relations Board shall seek enforcement of the final decision or order upon the request of the party. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, and appropriate evidence disclosing the failure to comply with the decision or order. If, after hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to the procedures established by the Public Employment Relations Board and that the person or entity refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce the order by writ of mandamus or other proper process. The court may not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 10.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28862.

This chapter, as amended by the act adding this section, shall not be interpreted as if it were in conflict with any collective bargaining agreement and shall not be implemented to abrogate an agreement entered into before January 1, 2021, between the district and an employee organization. This chapter shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the Public Employment Relations Board’s interpretation of parallel provisions in other statutes it enforces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 11.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28863.

Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to the district and its employees. Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 3558.8 of the Government Code, the district is a public employer for purposes of Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 293, Sec. 12.   (AB 2850)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [28870. - 28913.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [28870. - 28875.]

28870.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28871.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28872.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28873.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administration of the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28874.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the district from participating in and making all or part of its employees members of the State Employees’ Retirement System by contract entered into between the district and the board of administration of the system under the State Employees’ Retirement Law or from participating in the Federal Social Security Act pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing at Section 13775) of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient for such participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28875.

The board may classify and determine the officers and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [28890. - 28896.]

28890.

The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28891.

The retirement allowance may be predicated in part upon service rendered the district by a member prior to the establishment of the retirement system, which service is known as “prior service.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28892.

The board shall provide that both the district and the members shall contribute to the retirement system. The rate of contribution by an officer or employee of the district becoming a member of the retirement system shall be so fixed as to provide, with accumulated interest and based on tables and assumptions adopted by the board, substantially one-half the value of any retirement allowance granted for service, exclusive of any credits allowed for prior service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28893.

All members of the retirement system shall contribute in the manner and amount fixed by the board and such contributions may be collected by deducting the amounts thereof from the salary, wages, or compensation due such members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28894.

Liabilities accruing under the retirement system because of benefits other than such as are the equivalent of contributions by the members, with accumulated interest, shall be met by contributions by the district. Prior service or other liabilities of the district may be met by annual appropriations instead of by appropriation for the total of the liabilities; but until the present value of regular contributions for current service, together with assets then available, equals the present value of all allowances and benefits granted or to be granted under the system, the appropriation for any one year when added to any unused balance of any previous appropriations for such
 purpose shall not be less than the amount disbursed during that year on account of prior service or other liabilities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28895.

If any member withdraws from the retirement system prior to retirement the total amount contributed by him with such interest as may be credited thereto shall be returned to him; provided, however, that the board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which a member, whose district service is terminated except by death or retirement, may elect to leave his contributions and interest thereon in the retirement fund, and the terms and conditions upon which a retirement allowance may be made to him after such termination based upon his contributions prior to such termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28896.

All money received by any person as an annuity, pension, retirement allowance, disability payment, or death benefit from the retirement system, and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of the retirement system, whether in the actual possession of such person or deposited, loaned, or invested by him, is exempt from execution or any other process except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure and is unassignable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 166.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [28910. - 28913.]

28910.

The board shall create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28911.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28912.
